Massachusetts, session 194th, S2207.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of Chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in clause twenty-sixth by inserting the following subclause:-
(k) protected by the attorney-client privilege, the work product doctrine, or other
doctrinal protection from disclosure;
SECTION 2. Chapter 66 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 2. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “information governance plan” or “IG
plan” shall mean a comprehensive set of protocols for the efficient retention and routine disposal
of 2

of documents and data existing in any format or medium, whether or not said documents and
data are deemed public records as defined in clause twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4.
(b) Each agency and municipality subject to the requirements of this chapter with regard
to public records shall create, implement, maintain, and enforce a comprehensive information
governance plan, including, at minimum, protocols for: storage, naming, privacy, security,
routine disposal and methods for halting that disposal when necessary, and appropriate sharing of
documents and data existing in any format or medium.
(c) The IG plan shall comply with the state records retention schedule published and
maintained by the secretary of the commonwealth.
(d) The IG plan shall itself be a public record, provided that any portions thereof
protected from disclosure by one of the exemptions set forth in clause twenty-sixth of section 7
of chapter 4 may be redacted prior to production.
(e) The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this section.
of 2